Virginia statutes. Title 29.1. Wildlife, Inland Fisheries and Boating.
Article 1. Hunting, Trapping and Fishing Licenses.
§ 29.1-323.
By whom licenses issued.

The clerks of the circuit courts of cities, and such agents operating in Virginia cities as the Board may designate, shall issue state and city resident licenses, and county licenses for those counties contiguous to their respective cities. The clerks of the circuit courts of counties, and such agents operating in Virginia counties as the Board may designate, shall issue state licenses and county licenses for their respective counties. Agents, designated by the Board, who operate outside of Virginia, shall issue state licenses and such Virginia county or city licenses as agreed upon by the agent and the Department. Licenses shall be issued as provided for in this title, and clerks and agents shall date and authenticate the licenses in a manner prescribed by the Board. Any clerk who desires to be relieved of this duty shall notify the Board in writing and shall be relieved when the Board has designated an agent to sell licenses in his county or city.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-61; 1954, c. 280; 1958, c. 172; 1978, c. 485; 1987, c. 488; 2000, c. 132; 2003, c. 92.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 132 inserted “operating in Virginia cities” in the first and second sentences; added the third sentence; and in the fourth sentence, substituted “authenticate” for “sign” and added “in a manner prescribed by the Board” at the end of the sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 92 substituted “shall” for “may” in the last sentence.

§ 29.1-324.
Reserved.

§ 29.1-325.
Evidence that applicant entitled to license.

The clerk or agent shall require any applicant to make affidavit or to furnish other satisfactory evidence that he is entitled to the license applied for before issuing the license.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-63; 1978, c. 218; 1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-326.
Reserved.

§ 29.1-327.
Agents for sale of licenses and permits; sales by telephone and electronic media.

The Board shall have authority to appoint agents operating in and outside of Virginia for the issuance and sale of any or all of the permits and licenses provided for in this title. Those agents appointed shall be in addition to the clerks of the courts designated by §

29.1-323

and shall be chosen so as to best serve the public from the standpoint of geographic location and method of operation. Such agents operating in and outside of Virginia shall be subject to the laws and the rules and regulations of the Board covering the issuance and sale of licenses and permits. Rules and regulations promulgated by the Board shall be designed to ensure that agents provide adequate service to the public and shall include provisions for removing agents not performing their duties properly. Any contract between the Department and any agent operating outside of Virginia shall stipulate that application and construction of the contract is governed by the laws of Virginia. Before an agent’s appointment becomes effective, the agent shall be bonded by a surety company entitled to do business in this Commonwealth in the penalty of such amount as the Board may require, payable to the Commonwealth and conditioned upon the faithful performance of the agent’s duties.At such intervals as the Board may decide to be proper, the Board shall informally investigate the performance of agents appointed pursuant to this section to determine whether such agents are performing their duties in the public interest as provided by law and shall take any action deemed necessary to provide the best service in the public interest.

The Board may make and enter into agency contracts whereby the agent, whether operating in or outside of Virginia, may sell hunting and fishing licenses, issued under this title, by telephone, the Internet, or other electronic or computerized means. The contract shall establish the cost the agent may charge and receive per transaction which shall be in addition to the actual cost of the license sold during the transaction. A telephone or electronic media agent shall receive as compensation the fees for which he contracted with the Board and as determined and provided for in §

29.1-332

. A telephone or electronic media agent shall follow the provisions of the contract.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-65; 1950, p. 149; 1964, c. 562; 1966, c. 286; 1968, c. 522; 1970, c. 82; 1972, c. 133; 1973, c. 184; 1974, cc. 105, 107; 1975, cc. 153, 402; 1976, cc. 38, 171; 1977, c. 377; 1987, c. 488; 1999, c. 255; 2000, c. 132.

Cross references.

As to licenses required by the State Forester, see § 10.1-1152.

As to saltwater recreational fishing license fees, see §

28.2-302.2

.
As to special combined individual sportfishing licenses, see §

28.2-302.2

:1.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 132, in the first paragraph of subsection A, substituted “operating in and outside of Virginia” for “in counties, cities and towns” in the first sentence, inserted “operating in and outside of Virginia” in the third sentence, added the fifth sentence and substituted “of such amount” for “of $1,000, or such additional amount” in the sixth sentence; deleted “least annually or at” following “At” at the beginning of the second paragraph of subsection A; and in subsection B, inserted “whether operating in or outside of Virginia” and “the Internet, or other electronic or computerized means” in the first sentence, rewrote the third sentence, which read: “A telephone agent shall not receive any additional fee per license sold during a telephone transaction nor shall he retain as compensation the fee provided for in §

29.1-332

,” deleted the former fourth sentence, relating to the sale of one or more licenses to one applicant, and rewrote the last sentence, which read: “A telephone agent shall follow the rules and regulations established by the Board that apply to other agents, if such requirements are not provided for in the contract.”

§ 29.1-328.
Term of licenses and permits; multiple-year license.

Hunting and trapping licenses and permits shall be valid for one year from their date of purchase or future effective date, as authorized by the Department, except those licenses issued pursuant to §

29.1-305

, which shall be valid from July 1 of each year or their later date of purchase, to June 30 of the following year, unless sooner revoked.

Fishing licenses shall run and be valid for one year from their date of purchase or future effective date, as authorized by the Department.

The Board may authorize the sale of any annual license or permit issued under this title for a period exceeding the one-year term. Such a multiple-year license or permit shall be valid for the number of consecutive years stated on the permit or license. The fee for such a multiple-year license or permit shall not exceed the total amount that would be charged if the particular license or permit was purchased on an annual basis over the specified number of years.

The terms of licenses listed in subsections A, B, and C shall not apply to the lifetime hunting and fishing license established in §

29.1-302.1

.

National Forest Stamps, issued pursuant to §

29.1-408

, shall be valid for one year from their date of purchase, unless sooner revoked.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-66; 1980, c. 494; 1987, cc. 95, 488; 1988, c. 161; 2001, c. 115; 2002, c. 175; 2007, c. 39; 2011, c. 819; 2014, c. 255.

Editor’s note.

Pursuant to § 30-152, effect has been given in this section, as set out above, to Acts 1987, c. 95, which amended former § 29-66, the comparable provision in former Title 29.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 115, inserted “Until the Department has implemented an automated point-of-sale licensing system,” at the beginning of subsections A and B, and added the last sentences in subsections A and B.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 175 added “except those licenses issued pursuant to §

29.1-305

, which shall be valid from July 1 of each year or their later date of purchase, to June 30 of the following year, unless sooner revoked” at the end of subsection A.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 39 substituted “for one year from their date of purchase” for “from January 1 of each year or their later date of purchase, to December 31 of the same year or from July 1 of each year or their later date of purchase, to June 30 of the following year” in subsection D.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 819 added subsection C; redesignated former subsections C and D as subsections D and E; and in subsection D, substituted “subsections A, B, and C” for “subsections A and B of this section.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 255, in subsection A, substituted “Hunting” for “Until the Department has implemented an automated point-of-sale licensing system, hunting and trapping licenses and permits, including those issued pursuant to §

29.1-302

, shall be valid from July 1 of each year or their later date of purchase, to June 30 of the following year, unless sooner revoked. Upon implementation of such a system, hunting” and inserted “or future effective date, as authorized by the Department”; and in subsection B, substituted “Fishing” for “Until the Department has implemented an automated point-of-sale licensing system, fishing licenses shall run and be valid from January 1 of each year or their later date of purchase to December 31 of same year, unless sooner revoked. Upon implementation of such a system, fishing” and inserted “or future effective date, as authorized by the Department.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Tags are nontransferable. —

A Virginia hunter with a valid hunting license from the Virginia Department of Game and Inland Fisheries cannot transfer his hunting tags to another Virginia-licensed hunter to be used to harvest animals on behalf of the transferor. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Scott A. Surovell, Member, House of Delegates, 13-050, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 8 (2/21/14).

§ 29.1-329.
Reserved.

§ 29.1-330.
Delivery to clerk or agent; return of unused annually expiring materials and unsold licenses; voluntary contributions.

The Director shall send to each clerk or agent before the first day of the license year as many annually expiring licensing materials and licenses as he may deem necessary and shall hold each accountable for the amount and number sent. Clerks and agents shall, within 10 days after the end of the license year, return to the Director all unused annually expiring licensing materials, unsold licenses and the stubs of licenses sold. All annually expiring licensing materials and serially numbered licenses shall be accounted for by the Director. For licensing conducted by telephone or electronic media, the Director shall determine what additional equipment and nonannually expiring licensing materials are required by the clerks or agents, and he shall make available such equipment and materials to agents according to a schedule he deems appropriate.

Any form used in applying for a hunting permit or license issued under this title shall include language permitting the applicant to make a voluntary contribution of at least $2 to support the activities of Virginia Hunters Who Care, Inc., known as Hunters For The Hungry.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-68; 1976, c. 660; 1980, c. 494; 1987, c. 488; 2000, c. 132; 2003, cc. 95, 737; 2010, c. 3.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 132, in the first sentence, inserted “annually expiring licensing materials and” and inserted “amount and” preceding “number sent”; inserted “unused annually expiring licensing materials” in the second sentence; inserted “annually expiring licensing materials and” in the third sentence; and added the last sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 95 and 737 are identical, and in the first paragraph, added the subsection A designation, and substituted “10” for “ten”; and added subsection B.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 3 inserted “at least” preceding “$2” in subsection B.

§ 29.1-331.
Licenses to be dated, numbered and authenticated.

All licenses shall be dated, numbered, and authenticated by the clerk or agent by his signature or in such other manner as prescribed by the Director, and the clerk or agent shall show all other information required by law or the Board.

History.

1952, c. 366, § 29-68.1; 1960, c. 541; 1987, c. 488; 2000, c. 132.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 132 rewrote this section, which formerly specified the dating, numbering, signing and contents of the license.

§ 29.1-332.
License and permit receipts; compensation for issuing; sums to be credited to game protection fund.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

2.2-1802

, the money received for licenses and permits issued under this title shall be paid by each clerk or agent to the Department for payment into the state treasury. Payment shall be made by means prescribed by the Board and agreed to by the clerk or agent. For license sales by telephone or electronic media, the means of payment may include a continuous deposit of proceeds from the sale of licenses into accounts from which the Department may electronically transfer funds to a Departmental or state account at agreed-upon intervals. For license sales made other than by telephone or electronic media, the clerk or agent shall add $.50 to the fee for each license or permit he issues and retain the $.50 as compensation for such service.

Upon receipt into the treasury of such sums the Comptroller shall credit the sums to the game protection fund or to the Lifetime Hunting and Fishing Endowment Fund for licenses sold pursuant to §

29.1-302.1

.

The voluntary contributions collected pursuant to subsection B of §

29.1-330

and remitted to the Department shall be deposited into the state treasury and credited to a special nonreverting fund, within the game protection fund, known as the Feed the Hungry Fund. Monies in this fund shall be disbursed quarterly to Hunters For The Hungry to support its programs to feed the hungry and other statewide activities related to this mission.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 29-69, 29-71; 1976, c. 660; 1980, c. 494; 1987, cc. 95, 488; 1992, c. 374; 2000, c. 132; 2003, cc. 95, 737.

Editor’s note.

Pursuant to § 30-152, effect has been given in this section, as set out above, to Acts 1987, c. 95, which amended former § 29-71, the comparable provision in former Title 29.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 132, in subsection A, added the second and third sentences, and inserted “For license sales made other than by telephone or electronic media” at the beginning of the fourth sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 95 and 737 are identical, and twice substituted “$.50” for “fifty cents” in subsection A; and added subsection C.

§ 29.1-333.
Reports to Director as to sale of licenses.

When remitting license and permit receipts, each clerk or agent shall make a report to the Director, in a manner prescribed by the Director, which shall show (i) the quantity of licenses of each kind sold and the amount of gross collections for each kind of license, (ii) the amount of collections retained as compensation pursuant to §

29.1-332

, (iii) the net amount remitted to the Department, (iv) the amount of voluntary contributions collected pursuant to subsection B of §

29.1-330

, and (v) any other information that the Director may require.

For failure to make a report and remit the amount due within 30 days after the due date, the clerk or agent shall forfeit his compensation for issuing licenses on such report. If an agent fails to have funds in an amount equal to the Department’s records of reported license sales in any account from which remission of revenues to the Department is made by periodic electronic transfer, he shall forfeit his compensation for issuing licenses during the period covered by the transfer of the funds. For any subsequent failure to have funds equal to the Department’s records of reported license sales in an account from which remission of revenues to the Department is made by periodic electronic transfer, the Director may revoke the person’s status as a license agent.

For license sales made by telephone or electronic media, the reports and remittances to the Department shall be made not less than quarterly and in accordance with a schedule prescribed by the Board. For license sales made other than by telephone or electronic media, the reports and remittances to the Department shall be made as follows:

For July and August, not later than September 5.

For September, October, November and December, monthly, not later than the fifth of the succeeding month.

For January, February and March, quarterly, not later than April 5.

For April, May and June, quarterly, not later than July 5.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 29-70, 29-72, 29-73; 1976, c. 660; 1987, c. 488; 1992, c. 374; 2000, c. 132; 2003, cc. 95, 737.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 132 substituted “in a manner prescribed by the Director” for “on departmental forms” in subsection A; added the last two sentences in subsection B; and in subsection C, added the first sentence, inserted “For license sales, made other than by telephone or electronic media” at the beginning of the second sentence and deleted “the” preceding “remittances to the Department” in that sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 95
and 737 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted clause (iv) and redesignated former clause (iv) as clause (v); and substituted “30” for “thirty” in subsection B.

§ 29.1-334.
Certificate when license lost or destroyed.

If a license, other than a license issued by electronic means or a temporary license as described in §

29.1-335

, is lost or destroyed, the person to whom the license is issued may immediately apply to the clerk or agent who issued the license for a license certificate. Upon written statement that the license has been lost or destroyed, the clerk or agent shall issue a license certificate and endorse the number of the original license and date of issue thereon. A temporary license that is lost or destroyed may not be replaced with a license certificate. The fee of the clerk or agent for filing the statement and issuing a license certificate shall be twenty-five cents for agents and as prescribed in subdivision A 30 of §

17.1-275

for clerks and shall be paid by the applicant. The clerk or agent shall not be required to remit his fees for issuing license certificates. No licenses shall be redeemed or exchanged. Damaged licenses shall be returned to the Department in a manner prescribed by the Director, and proper deductions from the gross amount shall then be made. The Department shall furnish forms of written statements and license certificates and shall make available equipment and materials as needed or as required by this section. Replacement of any lost or destroyed license issued by electronic means should be made in a manner prescribed by the Director.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-74; 1976, c. 660; 1987, c. 488; 1994, c. 432; 2000, c. 132.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 132 inserted “other than a license issued by electronic means or a temporary license as described in §

29.1-335

” near the beginning of the first sentence; added the third sentence; substituted “returned to the Department in a manner prescribed by” for “attached to the report of the clerk or agent, sent to” in the sixth sentence; inserted “and shall make available equipment and materials as needed or” in the seventh sentence; and added the last sentence.

§ 29.1-335.
Hunting, trapping or fishing without a license.

No person shall hunt, trap, or fish without having obtained a license when such a license is required. For the purposes of this article, the term “license” shall include any temporary license issued by a clerk or agent to a buyer and authorized to be used in a manner prescribed by the Director. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and shall pay to the clerk a fee equal to the cost of the required license to be paid into the state treasury and credited to the game protection fund.

The purchase of a license subsequent to an arrest or notice of summons to appear in court for hunting, trapping or fishing without a license shall not relieve the person from the penalties specified in this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-75; 1987, c. 488; 1989, c. 421; 1993, c. 839; 2000, c. 132.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 132 added the second sentence in the first paragraph.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8B M.J. Fish and Fisheries, § 5; 14B M.J. Poisons and Poisoning, § 1.

§ 29.1-336.
Carrying licenses and certificates; penalty.

Every person who is issued a hunting, trapping, or fishing license shall carry the license on his person while hunting, trapping, or fishing. Persons who have been issued such licenses and fail to carry them when required shall be guilty of a Class 4 misdemeanor.

Any person who is 16 years of age or older and who is (i) required to present a certificate of completion in hunter education to obtain a hunting license pursuant to §

29.1-300.1

, and (ii) issued a hunting license by telephone, the Internet, or other electronic or computerized means, shall also carry such certificate on his person while hunting.

Any person who is 12 years of age through 15 years of age, and is issued a hunting license by telephone, the Internet, or other electronic or computerized means, shall carry his certificate of completion in hunter education on his person while hunting, unless he is accompanied and directly supervised by an adult who has, on his person, a valid Virginia hunting license and certificate if required under subsection B.

For purposes of this section and §

29.1-337

, “carry” means possess a hard copy or electronic copy of the license or certificate.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-75; 1987, c. 488; 2005, c. 145; 2015, c. 479; 2017, c. 363.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 145 inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and substituted “shall” for “must” in subsection A; and added subsections B and C.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 479 added subsection D.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 363 deleted “except that any license for bear, deer, or turkey required by §

29.1-305

shall be possessed in hard copy” at the end of subsection D.

§ 29.1-337.
Displaying license upon request.

Every person who is issued a hunting, trapping or fishing license and is carrying such a license when hunting, trapping or fishing shall present it immediately upon demand of any officer whose duty it is to enforce the game and inland fish laws. Refusing to exhibit the license upon demand of any conservation police officer or other officer shall be a Class 3 misdemeanor.

In accordance with §

18.2-133

, the hunting, trapping or fishing license shall also be shown upon the demand of any owner or lessee, or of any employee or representative of such owner or lessee, upon whose lands or waters the person may be hunting, fishing or trapping.

The Director may supply buttons or license holders and require the license or button to be displayed in a manner he may determine.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-76; 1987, c. 488; 1989, c. 421; 2007, c. 87.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

As to exceptions to the reasonable suspicion requirement to stop, board, or inspect a noncommercial vessel on navigable waters of the Commonwealth, see §

19.2-10.3

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 87 substituted “conservation police officer” for “game warden” in the last sentence of subsection A.

§ 29.1-337.1.
Penalty for false statements; altering, borrowing or lending license.

It shall be unlawful for any person to make a false statement in order to secure a license or to alter, change, borrow, or lend or attempt to use, borrow or lend a license. Any person violating this provision shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-76; 1987, c. 488.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 29.1-338.
Revocation of license and privileges; penalties.

If any person is found guilty of violating (i) any of the provisions of the hunting, trapping, or inland fish laws, any provision of §§

15.2-915.2

,

15.2-1209.1

,

18.2-131

through

18.2-136

, or §§

18.2-285

through

18.2-286.1

, or any regulation adopted by the Board pursuant thereto, a second time within three years of a previous conviction of violating any such law or regulation, or (ii) any provision of law or ordinance governing the dumping of refuse, trash, or other litter while engaged in hunting, trapping, or fishing, such license and privileges shall be revoked by the court trying the case and such person shall not apply for a new license or exercise such privileges until 12 months succeeding the date of conviction. The court may also prohibit the convicted person from hunting, fishing, or trapping in the Commonwealth for a period of one to five years. If found hunting, trapping, or fishing during such prohibited period, the person is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor and may also be prohibited by the court from hunting, fishing, or trapping for an additional period of one to five years. Licenses revoked shall be sent to the Director.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-77; 1962, c. 469; 1970, c. 274; 1983, c. 272; 1987, c. 488; 1989, c. 213; 2004, c. 462; 2010, c. 183; 2020, c. 311.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 462 substituted “18.2-286.1” for “18.2-287.1” in the first sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 183 substituted “18.2-136” for “18.2-135” in clause (i), substituted “such license and privileges” for “the license issued to such person” and “or exercise such privileges until 12 months” for “until twelve months” in clause (ii), and substituted “hunting, fishing, or trapping” for “obtaining any license to hunt, fish, or trap” and “one to five years” for “one year to five years” in the second sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 311, in the first sentence, substituted “or” for “and” following “18.2-136”; in the next to last sentence, added “and may also be prohibited by the court from hunting, fishing, or trapping for an additional period of one to five years”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 29.1-339.
Complimentary licenses.

The Director is authorized to issue complimentary hunting licenses and complimentary fishing licenses to the field inspectors of the United States Fish and Wildlife Service and public officials of the United States and of other states engaged in conservation work, including official representatives of out-of-state, nationally recognized, nongovernmental organizations engaged in wildlife conservation work; however, not more than seventy-five such complimentary hunting licenses shall be issued during one fiscal year, and not more than 150 such complimentary fishing licenses shall be issued during one calendar year.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-80; 1964, c. 474; 1982, c. 72; 1987, c. 488; 2001, c. 63.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 63 inserted “including official representatives of out-of-state, nationally recognized, nongovernmental organizations engaged in wildlife conservation work,” and substituted “seventy-five” for “75.”

§ 29.1-339.1.
Repealed by Acts 2005, c. 127, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions concerning Virginia Migratory Waterfowl Conservation Stamp, see §

29.1-339.2

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

29.1-339.1

, related to Virginia Migratory Waterfowl Conservation Stamp, was derived from Acts 1987, c. 89, § 29-77.2.

§ 29.1-339.2.
Establishment of Virginia Migratory Waterfowl Conservation Stamp; required.

No person shall hunt or take any migratory waterfowl within the Commonwealth without first obtaining a Virginia Migratory Waterfowl Conservation Stamp. Every person who is issued the Stamp shall carry it on his person when hunting or taking any migratory waterfowl. Each Stamp shall be validated by the signature of the licensee written across the face of such stamp. The Stamp shall be designed and produced in accordance with Department policy and shall be valid from July 1 of each year or their later date of purchase, to June 30 of the following year, unless sooner revoked. Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, any person who is exempt from hunting license requirements shall also be exempt from the requirements imposed by this section. Any person who is under the age of 16 years shall be exempt from the requirements of this section.

The fee for the Stamp for a resident and a nonresident is $9.75. Clerks and license agents who sell hunting licenses shall sell the Stamp and retain $0.75 as compensation for such service. The Board may subsequently revise the cost of the fees set forth in this section pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

The Stamp may also be issued through an automated license delivery system. The fee for the issuance of the Stamp through an automated license delivery system shall be consistent with the fees specified in §

29.1-332

. The format of the Stamp shall be the same as any other license, validation, or privilege issued through an automated license delivery system. When purchased through an automated license delivery system, the purchaser shall have the option of requesting the actual Stamp at the address specified on the license at the time of purchase.

The moneys received from the sale of the Stamp shall be paid by each clerk or agent to the Department for payment into the state treasury. Payment shall be made by means prescribed by the Board and agreed to by the clerk or agent. Upon receipt into the treasury of such moneys, the Comptroller shall credit the sums to the Game Protection Fund established in §

29.1-101

and accounted for as a separate fund to be designated as the Virginia Migratory Waterfowl Conservation Stamp Fund (the Stamp Fund). Moneys from the Stamp Fund shall not be diverted to any other state agency. The Department shall use the moneys in the Stamp Fund in the following manner:

The Department shall first utilize these moneys to cover any administrative costs associated with production and issuance of, and accounting for, the Stamp.

The Department shall contract 50 percent of the remaining annual revenue deposited in the Stamp Fund with appropriate nonprofit organizations for cooperative waterfowl habitat improvement projects. Before paying such moneys to any nonprofit organization, the Department shall obtain evidence that the organization is eligible to receive funds for such projects.

The remainder of the moneys in the Stamp Fund shall be used by the Department to protect, preserve, restore, enhance, and develop waterfowl habitat in Virginia.

The Department may establish (i) the method for selecting appropriate designs for the Stamp and (ii) eligibility criteria for receiving funds for waterfowl habitat improvement projects. The Department may sell expired Stamps for less than face value to the general public for a period of three years, after which time the Department shall shred any unsold expired Stamps. All revenues derived from the sale of these Stamps shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Game Protection Fund and dedicated to the Stamp Fund.

For purposes of this section:“Migratory waterfowl” means those migratory birds belonging to the Family Anatidae (ducks, geese, brant, and swans) for which open hunting seasons are established by federal regulations.“Stamp” means the Virginia Migratory Waterfowl Conservation Stamp.

History.

2005, c. 127; 2007, c. 644; 2009, c. 9.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 644 substituted “be valid from July 1 of each year or their later date of purchase, to June 30 of the following year, unless sooner revoked” for “expire annually as prescribed for hunting licenses in §

29.1-328

” at the end of the fourth sentence in subsection A.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added the last sentence in subsection B.